pt-PT: Grau de viscosidade do óleo: Extra leve; Pesado; Leve; Médio; Outro
pt-BR: Óleo grau de viscosidade: Extra leve; Pesado; Leve; Médio; Outros
en: Oil viscosity grade: Extra light; Heavy; Light; Medium; Other
pl: Klasa lepkości oleju: Bardzo lekka; Ciężka; Lekka; Średnia; Inne
cs: Stupeň viskozity oleje: Extra lehký; Těžký; Lehký; Střední; Ostatní
ru: Класс вязкости масла: Сверхлегкая; Тяжелая; Легкая; Средняя; Другое
da: Viskositetsgrad for olie: Ekstra let; Tung; Let; Medium; Andet
it: Grado di viscosità dell'olio: Extra leggero; Pesante; Leggero; Medio; Altro
es: Grado de viscosidad del aceite: Extraligero; Pesado; Ligero; Medio; Otro
el: Βαθμός ιξώδους λαδιού: Εξαιρετικά ελαφρύ; Βαρύ; Ελαφρύ; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Alyvos klampumo klasė: Ypač lengva; Sunki; Lengva; Vidutinė; Kita
fi: Öljyn viskositeettiluokka: Erittäin kevyt; Raskas; Kevyt; Keskipaksu; Muu
sk-SK: Stupeň viskozity oleja: Extra nízka; Vysoká; Nízka; Stredná; Iná
vi: Cấp độ nhớt của dầu: Siêu nhẹ; Đậm đặc; Nhẹ; Trung bình; Khác
hu: Olaj viszkozitási fokozata: Extra könnyű; Nehéz; Könnyű; Közepes; Egyéb
zh-TW: 油品黏度等級: 極輕; 重; 輕; 中; 其他
zh-CN: 油粘度等级: 极轻; 重; 轻; 中; 其他
ro-RO: Gradul de vâscozitate al uleiului: Extra ușor; Greu; Ușor; Mediu; Altele
th: ระดับความหนืดของน้ำมัน: เบาเป็นพิเศษ; หนัก; เบา; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Клас на вискозитет на маслото: Изключително леко; Тежко; Леко; Средно; Друго
nl: Olie viscositeitsklasse: Extra licht; Zwaar; Licht; Medium; Overige
tr: Yağ viskozite derecesi: Ekstra hafif; Ağır; Hafif; Orta; Diğer
sv: Oljeviskositetsgrad: Extra lätt; Tung; Lätt; Medium; Övrigt
ko: 오일 점도 등급: 엑스트라 라이트; 헤비; 라이트; 미디엄; 기타
sl-SI: Razred viskoznosti olja: Zelo lahko; Težko; Lahko; Srednje; Drugo
hr-HR: Ocjena viskoznosti ulja: Ekstralagano; Teško; Lagano; Srednje; Ostalo
fr: Grade de viscosité de l’huile: Extra légère; Lourde; Légère; Moyenne; Autre
de: Ölviskositätsklasse: Extra leicht; Schwer; Leicht; Mittel; Sonstige
nb: Oljeviskositetsgrad: Ekstra lett; Tung; Lett; Medium; Annet
ja: オイル粘度グレード: エクストラライト; ヘビー; ライト; ミディアム; その他